Washington statutes.
RCW 19.118.170

History of vehicle—Availability to owner.

Notwithstanding RCW 46.12.635, the department of licensing shall make available to the registered owner all title history information regarding the vehicle upon request of the registered owner and receipt of a statement that he or she is investigating or pursuing rights under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 171 s 6; 1995 c 254 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.

Effective date—Severability—1995 c 254: See notes following RCW 19.118.021.